District of Columbia statutes.
7-1142.03

Reporting requirements.

[Not funded].

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5120c
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-224, § 2(b), 62 DCR 231

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-224: Section 4 of D.C. Law 20-223 provided that the act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; and that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register and that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of the act.